Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.010

Judicial information system committee—Fees.

The judicial information system committee, as established by court rule, shall determine all matters pertaining to the delivery of services available from the judicial information system. The committee may establish a fee schedule for the provision of information services and may enter into contracts with any person, public or private, including the state, its departments, subdivisions, institutions, and agencies. However, no fee may be charged to county or city governmental agencies within the state of Washington using the judicial information system for the business of the courts.

[ 1989 c 364 s 1.]